Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Actions by or Against Officers; Liability; Penalties

§ 901.
Actions by or against town officers.

Where an action is given to any appointed or elected municipal officer or town school district officer, the action shall be brought in the name of the town in which the officer serves and in the case of a town school district officer in the name of the town school district. If the action is given against such officers, it shall be brought against such town or town school district, as the case may be.

The municipality shall assume all reasonable legal fees incurred by an officer when the officer was acting in the performance of his or her duties and did not act with any malicious intent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 36, eff. Oct. 1, 1968;

1973, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Parties.

24 V.S.A. § 901(a)

required that an action that residents filed against an incorporated village and village trustees be brought solely against the village because § 901 applied to officers of all municipal corporations. The village was a municipality under 1 V.S.A.§ 126, and the trustees were municipal officers. Merrill v. Village of N. Troy, 2008 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 103367 (D. Vt. Dec. 19, 2008).

Suits against police officers acting in their official capacities must be brought against the municipality. Hee v. Everlof, 812 F. Supp. 1350, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2181 (D. Vt. 1993).

§ 901a.
Tort claims against municipal employees.

As used in this section, “municipal employee” means any person employed for a wage or salary by a municipality; a volunteer whose services have been requested by the legislative body of a municipality; a volunteer whose services have been requested by a municipal officer; or a volunteer whose services have been requested by an employee of the municipality acting within the scope of the employee’s authority.

When the act or omission of a municipal employee acting within the scope of employment is alleged to have caused damage to property, injury to persons, or death, the exclusive right of action shall lie against the municipality that employed the employee at the time of the act or omission; and no such action may be maintained against the municipal employee or the estate of the municipal employee.

When a municipality assumes the place of a municipal employee in an action as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the municipality may assert all defenses available to the municipal employee, and the municipality shall waive any defense not available to the municipal employee, including municipal sovereign immunity.

The municipality shall defend and indemnify a municipal employee for any legal costs if a municipal employee is improperly named as a defendant in a proceeding.
(d) (1) The municipality shall defend and indemnify a municipal employee for any legal costs if a municipal employee is improperly named as a defendant in a proceeding.

The municipality shall defend or, when a cause of action contains elements not covered by insurance, reimburse legal defense and expense costs incurred by a municipal employee in the event that a municipal employee is named as a party under subsection (e) of this section and the employee is dismissed from the matter before the entry of a judgment by the court or the acts or omissions of the employee are determined not to be willful, intentional, or outside the scope of the employee’s authority.

This section shall not apply to an act or omission of a municipal employee that was willful, intentional, or outside the scope of the employee’s authority.

When two or more conflicting statutes provide protection to a municipal employee whose act or omission is alleged to have caused damage to property, injury to persons, or death, a court shall apply the statute that grants greater protection to the municipal employee.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 62

, § 1; see effective date note below.

§ 902.
Penalty.

Unless otherwise provided, a town officer who fails or neglects to perform a duty imposed upon him or her by law shall be fined not more than $100.00.

§ 903.
Nonliability of municipal officers for money paid out.

An action shall not be maintained against a person for money paid out by him or her as an officer of a municipal corporation in accordance with a vote of such corporation, whether such vote was valid or not.